Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1238
License; when required; action to enjoin activities.

Any person who fails to employ or use at least one individual appropriately licensed and available or any person who engages, without a license for such activities, in the construction of water wells, the installation of pumps and pumping equipment, the decommissioning of water wells, or the measuring of ground water levels, the collection of ground water samples from existing water wells, or the inspection of installed water well equipment, pumping systems, or chemigation regulation devices, in addition to the other penalties provided in the Uniform Credentialing Act or the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act, may be enjoined from continuing such activities.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 38;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1241, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 22;

Laws 2006, LB 508, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1169.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.